Vermont, session 2025-2026, H450.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 17 V.S.A. § 2602a is amended to read:
§ 2602a. APPOINTMENT OF RECOUNT COMMITTEE
(a)(1) Upon receipt of a petition, the county clerk shall notify all candidates
for the office that is the subject of the recount, advising them to each submit
VT LEG #379873 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.450
2025 Page 2 of 2
immediately a list of a minimum of 10 nominees for disinterested individuals
to serve on a recount committee.
(2)(A) If a list of nominees is not delivered to the county clerk within
two business days, the clerk shall notify the appropriate candidates that they
have 24 hours to submit lists of nominees for disinterested individuals to serve
on the recount committee.
* * *
(b)(1) The Superior Court shall make a minimum of 12 appointments to the
recount committee from among those nominated under this section, with the
number of appointments based on the number of votes to be recounted and a
goal of completing the recount within one day.
(2) In making these appointments, the court shall appoint an equal
number of persons disinterested individuals representing each candidate, to the
extent practicable.
(c) As used in this section, “disinterested individual” means an individual
who is not a relative of or subordinate to the candidates and who shares no
direct pecuniary interest with the candidates.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379873 v.1